src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kuoqig_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuoʼig: # Noun 60 'eng /est laev/fin' - full paradigm
     kuoʼig+N+Sg+Nom: [kuoʼig, kuoig]
     kuoʼig+N+Sg+Gen: [kuoʼig, kuoig]
     kuoʼig+N+Sg+Par: [kuoʼigõ, kuoigõ]
     kuoʼig+N+Sg+Dat: [kuoʼigõn, kuoigõn]
     kuoʼig+N+Sg+Ins: [kuoʼigkõks, kuoigkõks]
     kuoʼig+N+Sg+Ill: [kuoʼigõ, kuoigõ]
     kuoʼig+N+Sg+Ela: [kuoʼigstõ, kuoigstõ]
     kuoʼig+N+Pl+Nom: kuoigīd
     kuoʼig+N+Pl+Gen: kuoigīd
     kuoʼig+N+Pl+Par: kuoigīdi
     kuoʼig+N+Pl+Dat: kuoigīdõn
     kuoʼig+N+Pl+Ins: kuoigīdõks
     kuoʼig+N+Pl+Ill: kuoigīž
     kuoʼig+N+Pl+Ela: kuoigīst
